Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-3040
Controllable electronic record transactions; fees and charges.

The aggregate fees and charges, directly or indirectly, charged to a customer related to a single transaction or series of related transactions involving controllable electronic records effected through a controllable electronic record kiosk in this state, including any difference between the price charged to a customer to buy, sell, exchange, swap, or convert controllable electronic records and the prevailing market value of such controllable electronic records at the time of such transaction, shall not exceed eighteen percent of the value of the United States dollars involved in the transaction or transactions.

Laws 2025, LB609, § 9.